Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Chapter 65. Death Investigations and Medical Examiners.

Cross references. —

For inquests, see AS

09.55.062

—

09.55.069

.

Collateral references. —

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Coroners or Medical Examiners, § 1 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Coroners, § 1 et seq.

80 C.J.S., Sheriffs and Constables, § 61.

Liability for wrongful autopsy. 18 ALR4th 858, 31 ALR Fed. 156.